North Dakota, session 69, SB2321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 32-15-28 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
32-15-28. Public corporation bound by judgment.
In the event that anyIf a property is being acquired by anya public corporation through
condemnation proceedings, suchthe public corporation shall beis bound by the judgment
rendered thereinin the condemnation proceedings and within six months after the entry of such
a judgment shall pay intothe court the full amount of the judgment on account of damages. If the
public corporation shall dismissdismisses the action prior tobefore the entry of judgment
thereon, the court shall award to the defendant reasonable actual or statutory costs, or both,
which shall includeincludes reasonable attorney's fees and the costs incurred for retaining an
expert witness for use during the condemnation proceeding.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 32-15-32 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
32-15-32. Costs.
1. The court may in its discretion award to the defendant reasonable actual or statutory
costs or both, which may includeincludes interest from the time of taking except
interest on the amount of a deposit which is available for withdrawal without prejudice
to right of appeal, costs on appeal, the costs incurred for retaining an expert witness
for use during the condemnation proceeding, and reasonable attorney's fees for all
judicial proceedings.
Page No. 1 25.0662.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
2. If the defendant appeals and does not prevail, the costs on appeal may be taxed
against the defendant. In all cases whenIf a new trial has beenis granted upon the
application of the defendant and the defendant has failed upon such trialfails to obtain
greater compensation than was allowed the defendant uponat the first trial, the costs
of suchthe new trial shallmust be taxed against the defendant.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 32-15-35 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
32-15-35. Eminent domain proceedings - Costs of defendant to be paid whenif
proceedings withdrawn or dismissed by party bringing the proceedings.
WheneverIf the state acting by and through its officers, departments, or agencies, or any
municipality or political subdivision of this state acting by and through its officers, departments,
or agencies, or any public utility, corporation, limited liability company, association, or other
entity which has been grantedorganization with the power of eminent domain by the state, shall
commencecommences eminent domain proceedings against any land within thisthe state and
thereaftersubsequently withdraws or has suchthe proceedings are dismissed without agreement
of the defendant, the state, municipality, political subdivision, public utility, corporation, limited
liability company, association, or entityparty commencing such eminent domainthe proceedings
shall beis liable for and pay toto pay the owner of suchthe land all court costs, expenses, and
fees, including reasonable attorney's fees, and the costs incurred for retaining an expert witness
for use during the condemnation proceeding as shall be determined by the court in which the
proceedings were filed.
Page No. 2 25.0662.01000